Wyoming statutes. Title 24 Highways
Chapter 1 General Provisions
§ 24-1-135.
Vietnam veterans welcome home highway.

United States interstate highway 25 between the Colorado/Wyoming border and its terminus at Buffalo, Wyoming shall be known as the “Wyoming Vietnam Veterans Welcome Home Highway.”

History.

2015 ch. 119, § 1, effective March 3, 2015.

§ 24-1-136.
Wyoming Women’s Suffrage Pathway-highway designation.

State highway 28 from the Fremont county line northeast to the boundary of the Shoshone national forest shall be known as the “Wyoming Women’s Suffrage Pathway.”

History.

2018 ch. 59, § 1, effective March 12, 2018.

Effective date.

— Laws 2018, ch. 59, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 12, 2018.

§ 24-1-137.
Wild Horse Highway.

United States highway 14/16/20 between Wyoming state highway 32 and the city boundary of Cody, Wyoming shall be known as the “Wild Horse Highway.”

History.

2019 ch. 53, § 1, effective February 18, 2019.

Effective date. —

Laws 2019, ch. 53, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by
art. 4, § 8 of the Wyo. Const. Approved February 18, 2019.

§ 24-1-138.
Dr. Leonard L. Robinson World War II Bataan Death March memorial bridge.

The bridge on United States Interstate Highway 25 crossing over Center Street in Casper, Wyoming shall be known as the “Dr. Leonard L. Robinson World War II Bataan Death March Memorial Bridge.” The department of transportation shall install appropriate signage, in compliance with applicable federal and state law, to identify the Dr. Leonard L. Robinson World War II Bataan Death March Memorial Bridge.

History.

2020 ch. 138, § 1, effective July 1, 2020.

Effective date. —

Laws 2020, ch. 138, § 4, makes the act effective July 1, 2020.